District of Columbia statutes.
47-4479

Judgment for wrongful distraint.

If there is a recovery in a suit or proceeding against the Mayor (or the Mayor’s designee), for a wrongful distraint or any other act performed by the Mayor or for the recovery of money paid to the Mayor and transmitted to the District of Columbia in the performance of the Mayor’s official duty, and the court finds there was probable cause for the act performed, an execution shall not issue thereon, but the amount so recovered shall, upon final judgment, be paid by the District of Columbia in the same manner as judgments against the District of Columbia are paid.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334